District of Columbia statutes.
21-528

Detention of person pending judicial proceedings.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, the administrator of a hospital in which a person is hospitalized under this subchapter may, if judicial proceedings for his hospitalization have been commenced under subchapter IV of this chapter, detain the person in the hospital during the course of the judicial proceedings.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 754, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
1981 Ed., § 21-528.
1973 Ed., § 21-528.
D.C. Law 14-283 substituted “commitment” for “hospitalization”.
Section 2(m) of D.C. Law 14-131 repealed this section.
For applicability of § 2(m) of D.C. Law 14-131, see note following § 21-502.
Section 5(b) of D.C. Law 14-131 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) addition of applicability provision of § 2(d), (k)(2), (m), (q)(3) and (4), (s), and (t) of D.C. Act 14-265, see § 4 of Mental Health Commitment Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-265, January 30, 2002, 49 DCR 1450).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2(m) of Mental Health Commitment Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-265, January 30, 2002, 49 DCR 1450).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2(m) of Mental Health Commitment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-350, April 24, 2002, 49 DCR 4417).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section applicable upon the enactment of certain legislation by the United States Congress, see §§ 2(n) and 3 of Mental Health Civil Commitment Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-546, December 12, 2002, 50 DCR 199).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see §§ 2(n) and (3) of Mental Health Civil Commitment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-41, March 24, 2003, 50 DCR 2784).